Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9-120 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The board of education of any school district furnishing
transportation is hereby directed to furnish transportation to child
care facilities within the district for children attending the
schools of that district. Provided, however, that such child care
facility shall be on a transportation route already taken.

Req. No. 14119 Page 1

B. Two or more districts may enter into agreements for the
furnishing of such transportation.
C. The expense of any such additional transportation shall be
paid by the children so transported or from other private sources.
Money so collected shall not be chargeable to or become a part of
the school district's finances.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14119 CMA 12/31/25















Req. No. 14119 Page 2